Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2327
Execution.

Except as provided for holographic wills, writings within section 30-2338, and wills within section 30-2331, every will is required to be in writing signed by the testator or in the testator's name by some other individual in the testator's presence and by his direction, and is required to be signed by at least two individuals each of whom witnessed either the signing or the testator's acknowledgment of the signature or of the will.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 49, UPC § 2-502.

A document purporting to be a will, which is otherwise sufficient, will satisfy the "writing" requirement of this section, whether it is completely handwritten; partly written in ink and partly in pencil; partly typewritten and partly printed; partly printed, partly typewritten, and partly written; or on a printed form, as well as other combinations of these forms and comparable permanent techniques of writing which substantively evidence testamentary intent. In re Estate of Pluhacek, 296 Neb. 528, 894 N.W.2d 325 (2017).

In order to be valid, a will must be signed by witnesses prior to the testator's death. In re Estate of Flicker, 215 Neb. 495, 339 N.W.2d 914 (1983).

Testamentary capacity is not an element of due execution. In re Estate of Flider, 213 Neb. 153, 328 N.W.2d 197 (1982).

An attesting witness need not probe into a testator's mental capacity prior to signing a will as a witness. In re Estate of Camin, 212 Neb. 490, 323 N.W.2d 827 (1982).

There is no requirement under this section that the acknowledgment of a testator's signature on a will be duly sworn or confirmed by oath or affirmation; rather, the two witnesses must witness either the signing of the will or
the testator's acknowledgment of the signature. In re Estate of Loftus, 26 Neb. App. 439, 920 N.W.2d 718 (2018).